Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 4. Larceny and Related Offenses

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2020, ch. 90, § 2, provides: “With the amendments in Section 1 of this act, it is the intent of the legislature to define one (1) crime of theft and to incorporate therein the theft crimes previously listed in title 6, chapter 3, article 4 of the Wyoming statutes, thereby removing distinctions and technicalities that previously existed in the pleading and proof of such crimes.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Burglary in Wyoming,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 721 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When statute of limitations begins to run against criminal prosecution for embezzlement, fraud, false pretenses, or similar crimes, 77 ALR3d 689.

Embezzlement, larceny, false pretenses, or allied criminal fraud by a partner, 82 ALR3d 822.

Criminal liability for theft of, interference with, or unauthorized use of, computer programs, files or systems, 51 ALR4th 971.

Cat as subject of larceny, 55 ALR4th 1080.

What is “trade secret” so as to render actionable under state law its use or disclosure by former employee, 59 ALR4th 641.

What constitutes theft within automobile theft insurance policy — modern cases, 67 ALR4th 82.

What constitutes violation of 15 USC § 714m(c), proscribing larceny or conversion of property owned by or pledged to Commodity Credit Corporation, 109 ALR Fed 871.

§ 6-3-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 191, § 3.

“Deprive” means:

To withhold property of another permanently or for so extended a period as to appropriate a major portion of its economic value or with intent to restore only upon payment of reward or other compensation; or

To dispose of the property so as to make it unlikely that the owner will recover it.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Property” means as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(viii) and also includes services;

“Services” includes, but is not limited to, electric, telephone, cable television, gas, water or sewer services.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(iii), substituted “6-3-411” for “6-3-409.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2013 amendment

, effective July 1, 2013, repealed former (a)(i) which read: “‘Bailee’ means a person other than the owner of property who rightfully possesses property” and substituted “6-3-413” for “6-3-411” in (a)(iii).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(iii), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

6-3-401

through

6-3-413

."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(iv) and (a)(v).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Evidence insufficient to find “bailee.” —

The evidence was insufficient to form the basis for a reasonable inference of guilt beyond a reasonable doubt that the defendant was a bailee where in all pertinent instances, the “owners” of the property at issue in the case gave “ownership,” not mere possession of the property to the defendant. Lahr v. State, 840 P.2d 930,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1992).

Evidence sufficient to find “bailee.” —

Evidence was sufficient for jury to conclude that manager stood in status of a bailee, not a co-owner, with respect to bar owners. Wentworth v. State, 975 P.2d 22,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 37

(Wyo. 1999).

“Deprive.” —

In a prosecution for burglary based on defendant's entering and driving a vehicle without permission, the trial court erred in refusing to give his proposed instruction regarding the meaning of the word “deprive” in this section, since there was evidence that defendant intended only to make temporary use of the vehicle. Brett v. State, 961 P.2d 385,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1998).

Where customer was unable to use truck he purchased due to defendant's failure to provide him with proof of title for more than five months, defendant appropriated truck's economic value and thus had requisite “intent to deprive.” Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

Jury can reasonably find intent to deprive in instances of temporary deprivations. Merchant v. State, 4 P.3d 184,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2000).

In a prosecution for burglary of a vehicle, the trial court did not err in failing to provide the jury with the statutory definition of the word “deprive,” as provided in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-3-401

. The definitions in §

6-3-401

apply to article 4, concerning larceny, not to article 3, concerning burglary. Burkhardt v. State, 2005 WY 96, 117 P.3d 1219,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 2005).

“Deprive.” —

Jury instructions
were proper during defendant's trial for aggravated burglary because
the instructions adequately informed the jury of the element of “burglary,”
including the specific intent to commit larceny and the required
intent
to deprive for larceny.
Dennis v. State, 2013 WY 67, 302 P.3d 890,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2013).

Relation to felony larceny. —

Sufficient evidence supported a conviction for felony larceny because there was an intent to permanently deprive where defendant kept a vehicle for 3 months, lied about the owner of the truck, and made no effort to return the truck to the owner or advise him of its location. Defendant argued that his actions constituted joyriding or unauthorized use.
Peña v. State, 2013 WY 4, 294 P.3d 13,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2013).

Evidence was sufficient to convict defendant for felony theft because defendant possessed the requisite intent to deprive where he admitted that he intended to drive a vehicle until it ran out of gas and then abandon it. 2015 WY 86,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 97

.

Evidence as to permissive use. —

Grand larceny defendant was entitled to testify about his girlfriend's out-of-court statement that truck owner had given them permission to use the truck; the statement was admissible to show its effect on the defendant's intent and subsequent conduct, rather than for the truth of the matter asserted. Kenyon v. State, 986 P.2d 849,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 1999).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-3-402.
Theft; penalties.

A person is guilty of theft if he knowingly takes, obtains, procures, retains or exercises control over or makes an unauthorized transfer of an interest in the property of another person without authorization or by threat or by deception, or he receives, loans money by pawn or pledge on or disposes of the property of another person that he knew or reasonably should have known was stolen, and he:

Intends to deprive the other person of the use or benefit of the property;

Knowingly uses, receives, conceals, abandons or disposes of the property in such manner as to deprive the other person of its use or benefit; or

Demands anything of value to which he has no legal claim as a condition for returning or otherwise restoring the property to the other person.

Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 191 § 3.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, theft is:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years, a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or both, if the value of the property is one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or more or if the property is a firearm, horse, mule, sheep, cattle, buffalo or swine regardless of value; or

Repealed by Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 3.

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if the value of the property is less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

through (f) Repealed by Laws 2013, ch. 191 § 3.

In addition to the penalties provided in subsection (c) of this section, any person convicted of a second or subsequent offense for theft of motor vehicle fuel offered for retail sale shall have his driver’s license suspended pursuant to W.S. 31-7-128(n). The court shall forward to the department of transportation a copy of the record pertaining to disposition of the arrest or citation.

The amount of property involved in violations of this section committed pursuant to a common scheme or the same transaction, whether the property is taken from the same person or different persons, may be aggregated in determining the value of the property.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; 1985, ch. 2, § 1; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; 2007, ch. 68, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 17, § 1, effective February 9, 2021.

Cross references. —

For definition of “bailee,” see
§

6-3-401

.

As to embezzlement of estate before letters are granted, see §§

2-7-411

through

2-7-414

.

As to taking and using horses and equipment without consent of owner, see §

11-30-109

.

As to appropriation of horse or mule on open range without permission, see §

11-30-110

.

For provision that dogs shall be deemed personalty and subject to larceny, see §

11-31-102

.

As to penalty for refusing to deliver military property, see §

19-8-105

.

As to punishment for wrongful selling, damaging, destroying or losing any military property, see §

19-12-110

.

As to identification of vehicles and prevention of theft, see §§

31-11-101

to

31-11-111

.

As to stealing railroad equipment, see §

37-12-101

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (c)(i) and (iii), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000.00)” for “five hundred dollars ($500.00).”

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (f); and updated the internal references in the introductory language of (c).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, rewrote (a); deleted the exception at the beginning of (c); and repealed former (b) and (d) through (f).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, redesignated (a) as the introductory language of (a) and (a)(i); in the introductory language of (a)(i) substituted “takes, obtains, procures, retains or exercises control” for “takes or exercises unauthorized control” and “person without authorization or by threat or by deception, or he receives, loans money by pawn or pledge on or disposes of the property of another person that he knew or reasonably should have known was stolen, and he” for “person with the purpose of depriving”; in (a)(i) added “Intends to deprive” at the beginning and “the use or benefit of” preceding “the property”; added (a)(ii) and (a)(iii); in the introductory language of (c) added “Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section” at the beginning; in (c)(i) added “or if the property is a firearm, horse, mule, sheep, cattle, buffalo or swine regardless of value” at the end; and added (g) and (h).

The 2021 amendment

added "or" at the end of (a)(ii).

Laws 2021, ch. 17, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 9, 2021.

I. General Consideration

II. Embezzlement.

§ 6-3-403.
Wrongful taking or disposing of property; venue of indictment. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-404.
Shoplifting; altering or removing price tags and markers; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-405.
Reasonable detention and interrogation of persons suspected of shoplifting or altering price tag; defense in civil or criminal action.

A peace officer, merchant or merchant’s employee who has reasonable cause to believe a person is violating W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store may detain and interrogate the person in regard to the suspected violation in a reasonable manner and for a reasonable time.

In a civil or criminal action for slander, false arrest, false imprisonment, assault, battery or wrongful detention based upon a detention and interrogation pursuant to this section, it is a defense that the peace officer, merchant or merchant’s employee had reasonable cause to believe the person was violating W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store and the detention and interrogation were conducted in a reasonable manner and for a reasonable time.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 2020 ch. 90, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to false imprisonment generally, see §

6-2-203

.

As to security against search and seizure, see art. 1, § 4, Wyo. Const.

As to arrest by persons other than officers upon reasonable grounds to believe a petit larceny or felony has been committed, see §

7-8-101

.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) and (b) substituted “W.S.

6-3-402

with regard to property offered for sale by a wholesale or retail store” for “W.S.

6-3-404

.”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Principal's liability for punitive damages because of false arrest or imprisonment or malicious prosecution by agent or employee, 93 ALR3d 826.

Defendant's state of mind necessary or sufficient to warrant award of punitive damages in action for false arrest or imprisonment, 93 ALR3d 1109.

Excessiveness or inadequacy of compensatory damages for false imprisonment or arrest, 48 ALR4th 165.

§ 6-3-406.
Defrauding an innkeeper; penalties; definitions. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-407.
Obtaining property by false pretenses; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-408.
Theft of services; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1984, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1985, ch. 149, § 2; 2004, ch. 126, § 1; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-409.
Fraudulently obtaining telecommunications services deemed misdemeanor. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 126, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 37-259.1; W.S. 1977, §

37-12-123

; Laws 1983, ch. 171, § 5; 1984, ch. 44, § 2; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-410.
Value of property may be aggregated in certain cases. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 44, § 1; 2013 ch. 191, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-411.
Unlawful use of theft detection shielding devices; penalty.

A person commits unlawful use of a theft detection shielding device when he knowingly manufacturers, sells, offers for sale or distributes any laminated or coated bag or device peculiar to shielding and intended to shield merchandise from detection by an electronic or magnetic theft alarm sensor.

A person commits unlawful possession of a theft detection shielding device when he knowingly possesses any laminated or coated bag or device peculiar to and designed for shielding and intended to shield merchandise from detection by an electronic or magnetic theft alarm sensor, with the intent to commit theft.

A person commits unlawful possession of a theft detection device remover when he knowingly possesses any tool or device designed to allow the removal of any theft detection device from any merchandise without the permission of the merchant or person owning or holding the merchandise, with the intent to commit theft.

A person commits the offense of unlawful removal of a theft detection device when he intentionally removes the device from a product prior to purchase without the permission of the merchant or person owning or holding the merchandise.

A person who commits any of the offenses specified under subsections (a) through (d) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 168, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 1.

§ 6-3-412.
Unlawful taking of motor vehicle fuel; penalties. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-413.
Rustling; penalty. [Repealed]

History.

2013 ch. 191, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; repealed by 2020 ch. 90, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

§ 6-3-414.
Trespassing to unlawfully collect resource data; unlawful collection of resource data.

A person is guilty of trespassing to unlawfully collect resource data from private land if he:

Enters onto private land for the purpose of collecting resource data; and

Does not have:

An ownership interest in the real property or, statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data.

A person is guilty of unlawfully collecting resource data if he enters onto private land and collects resource data from private land without:

An ownership interest in the real property or, statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to enter the private land to collect the specified resource data.

A person is guilty of trespassing to access adjacent or proximate land if he:

Crosses private land to access adjacent or proximate land where he collects resource data; and

Does not have:

An ownership interest in the real property or, statutory, contractual or other legal authorization to cross the private land; or

Written or verbal permission of the owner, lessee or agent of the owner to cross the private land.

Crimes committed under subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section are punishable as follows:

By imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both;

By imprisonment for not less than ten (10) days nor more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if the person has previously been convicted of trespassing to unlawfully collect resource data or unlawfully collecting resource data.

As used in this section:

“Collect” means to take a sample of material, acquire, gather, photograph or otherwise preserve information in any form and the recording of a legal description or geographical coordinates of the location of the collection;

Repealed by Laws 2016, Ch. 117, § 2.

“Peace officer” means as defined by W.S.

7-2-101

;

“Resource data” means data relating to land or land use, including but not limited to data regarding agriculture, minerals, geology, history, cultural artifacts, archeology, air, water, soil, conservation, habitat, vegetation or animal species. “Resource data” does not include data:

For surveying to determine property boundaries or the location of survey monuments;

Used by a state or local governmental entity to assess property values;

Collected or intended to be collected by a peace officer while engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties.

No resource data collected on private land in violation of this section is admissible in evidence in any civil, criminal or administrative proceeding, other than a prosecution for violation of this section or a civil action against the violator.

Resource data collected on private land in violation of this section in the possession of any governmental entity as defined by W.S. 1-39-103(a)(i) shall be expunged by the entity from all files and data bases, and it shall not be considered in determining any agency action.

History.

2015 ch. 146, § 1, effective March 5, 2015; 2016 ch. 117, § 1, effective March 15, 2016.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first
2016 amendment, by ch. 117 § 1, in the introductory language of (a), inserted “from private land” following “data”; in (a)(i) substituted “private” for “open” preceding “land”; in (a)(i)(A), substituted “enter the private land” for “enter or access the land” and inserted “the specified” preceding “resource data”; in (a)(ii)(B), substituted “enter the private land” for “enter or access the land”; in the introductory language of (b), deleted “open” preceding “land” and inserted “from private land” preceding “without”; in (b)(ii), inserted “private” preceding “land”; added present (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in present (d), substituted “Crimes committed under subsection (a), (b) or (c) of this section” for “Trespassing to unlawfully collect resource data and unlawfully collecting resource data”; in present (e)(i), substituted “and the recording of a legal description or geographical coordinates of the location of the collection” for “from open land which is submitted or intended to be submitted to any agency of the state or federal government”; in present (f), inserted “on private land” following “collected”; and in (g) inserted “on private land” following “collected.”

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 117 § 2, repealed former (d)(ii), which read: “"Open land" means land outside the exterior boundaries of any incorporated city, town, subdivision approved pursuant to W.S.

18-5-308

or development approved pursuant to W.S.

18-5-403

.”

Laws 2016 ch. 117, § 3, makes the act effective upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 146, § 1 makes the act effective March 5, 2015.

Constitutional.

Protected speech.

Constitutional.

Plaintiffs
could not have maintained a Free Speech First Amendment challenge
because the statutes did not regulate protected First Amendment activity,
there was no constitutionally protected First Amendment right to enter
upon the private lands of another for the purposes of collecting data,
the statutes were not facially overbroad, and the court declined to
conduct a facial analysis of the statutes' expungement provisions. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 196 F. Supp. 3d 1231, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 88843 (D. Wyo. 2016), rev'd, 869 F.3d 1189, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

Statutes passed
the rational basis test and therefore did not violate the Equal Protection
Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment because the statutes were not promulgated
out of animus toward a particular group, and did not burden a fundamental
right because the statutes precluded trespassing to collect any resource
data, regardless of whether that data was favorable or unfavorable
to the owner, and the statutes rationally related to the interest
of protecting private property rights. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 196 F. Supp. 3d 1231, 2016 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 88843 (D. Wyo. 2016), rev'd, 869 F.3d 1189, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).

Protected speech.

Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

6-3-414

,

40-27-101

(2016) regulated protected speech under First Amendment,
and they were not shielded from constitutional scrutiny merely because
they touched upon access to private property; although trespassing
did not enjoy First Amendment protection, statutes targeted creation
of speech by imposing heightened penalties on those who collected
resource data. Western Watersheds Project v. Michael, 869 F.3d 1189,

2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 17279

(10th Cir. Wyo. 2017).